Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5574.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 409c. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), an individual who, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person the individual knows or reasonably should know is a first responder performing the first responder's duties, knowingly and willfully violates the warning and approaches and remains within 25 feet of the first responder with the intent to do any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both: (a) Impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to do the first responder's duty. (b) Threaten the first responder with physical harm. (c) Harass the first responder. (2) An individual who violates subsection (1) causing injury to the first responder is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who violates subsection (1) causing the death of the first responder is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 15 years, a fine of not more than $7,500.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5575 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.